Washington statutes.
RCW 39.42.070

Computation of general state revenues—Filing of certificate—Estimate of debt capacity.

On or after *the effective date of this act, the treasurer shall compute general state revenues for the three fiscal years immediately preceding such date and shall determine the arithmetic mean thereof. As soon as is practicable after the close of each fiscal year thereafter, he or she shall do likewise. In determining the amount of general state revenues, the treasurer shall include all state money received in the treasury from each and every source whatsoever except: (1) Fees and revenues derived from the ownership or operation of any undertaking, facility or project; (2) moneys received as gifts, grants, donations, aid or assistance or otherwise from the United States or any department, bureau or corporation thereof, or any person, firm or corporation, public or private, when the terms and conditions of such gift, grant, donation, aid or assistance require the application and disbursement of such moneys otherwise than for the general purposes of the state of Washington; (3) moneys to be paid into and received from retirement system funds, and performance bonds and deposits; (4) moneys to be paid into and received from trust funds including but not limited to moneys received from taxes levied for specific purposes and the several permanent funds of the state and the moneys derived therefrom but excluding bond redemption funds; (5) proceeds received from the sale of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness. Upon computing general state revenues, the treasurer shall make and file in the office of the secretary of state, a certificate containing the results of such computations. Copies of said certificate shall be sent to each elected official of the state and each member of the legislature. The treasurer shall, at the same time, advise each elected official and each member of the legislature of the current available debt capacity of the state, and may make estimated projections for one or more years concerning debt capacity.

[ 2009 c 500 s 1; 2009 c 479 s 24; 2007 c 215 s 2; 2003 1st sp.s. c 9 s 1; 2002 c 240 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 7.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) For "the effective date of this act," see RCW 39.42.900.

(2) This section was amended by 2009 c 479 s 24 and by 2009 c 500 s 1, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2009 c 500: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 500 s 14.]

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 215: "The legislature finds that after passage of a constitutional amendment (*House Joint Resolution No. 4215 or Senate Joint Resolution No. 8220), the state investment board will be permitted in accordance with RCW 43.33A.140 to invest a portion of the higher education permanent funds in equities. The legislature further recognizes that by investing in equities, the value of the higher education permanent funds may fluctuate over time due to market changes even if no disposition of the fund principal is made. The removal of the word "irreducible" in this act, describing the higher education permanent funds, is needed to clarify that the mere reduction in market value of a permanent fund due to such fluctuations would not violate the mandate of the statute. It is the intent of the legislature to clarify state law to permit equity investment of higher education permanent funds even if there is a decline in the value of a permanent fund due to market changes. It is not the intent of the legislature to change the requirement that unless otherwise allowed by law the principal amounts in the higher education permanent funds are to be held in perpetuity for the benefit of the designated institutions and future generations, and that only the earnings from a higher education permanent fund may be appropriated to support the benefited institution." [ 2007 c 215 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: House Joint Resolution No. 4215 passed the legislature on April 11, 2007.

Contingent effective date—2007 c 215: "This act takes effect if the proposed amendment to Article XVI of the state Constitution regarding investment of certain state moneys is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety." [ 2007 c 215 s 10.] The proposed amendment to Article XVI of the state Constitution (Substitute House Joint Resolution No. 4215) was approved by the people at the November 6, 2007, general election.

Effective date—2002 c 240: See RCW 43.99G.903.